Hawaii, session 2025, GM1365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds, that escalating costs of
goods over the years, particularly during the COVID-19 pandemic,
have created numerous difficulties regarding small purchase
procurement. The legislature further finds that the frequency
of earthquakes on Hawaii island, an indicator of a future
potentially devastating volcanic eruption that could impact
residential and commercial areas, as well as the devastation
from the tragic 2023 Maui wildfires, emphasize the inescapable
need to address issues with small purchase procurements to
facilitate more efficient disaster recovery efforts.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Increase the minimum amount for purchases constituting
small purchase procurements that are subject to an
electronic system, from $25,000 to $50,000; and
(2) Require the state procurement office to submit a
report to the legislature on the efficacy of the
increased minimum small purchase procurement amounts.
2025-2836 SB383 GDI SMA.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO.
-2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 103D-305, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
’’ (c) Procurements of [$25,000] $50, 000 to less than
$250,000 shall be made in accordance with small purchase
procedures; provided that [such] these small purchase
procurements shall be conducted through an electronic system
[ohall be roquirod]."
SECTION 3. No later than twenty days prior to the
convening of the regular session of 2026, the state procurement
office shall submit to the legislature a report of its findings
and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, on the
efficacy of the amendment to section 103D-305, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, made by section 2 of this Act.
SECTION 4. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2836 SB383 CDl SMA.docx

■iiiiMiigiiHiiiiiiiliiii

S.B. NO. ga
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 1st day of July , 2025

S.B. No. 383, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
134

SB No. 383, SD 2, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives